Maryland, session 2026, SB0720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
– 1 –

Ch. 634 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SUBTITLE 22. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN EDUCATION.
7–2201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
7–2202.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE GUIDANCE ON ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TO LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS, EDUCATORS, PARENTS, AND STUDENTS
THROUGH AN ONLINE PLATFORM THAT:
(I) PROMOTES THE SAFE, RESPONSIBLE, EQUITABLE, AND
ETHICAL USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(II) PROMOTES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE LITERACY
THROUGH COMPUTER SCIENCE EDUCATION;
(II) (III) EMPHASIZES STUDENTS AND TEACHERS AT THE
CENTER OF EDUCATIONAL TECHNOLOGY;
(III) (IV) PRIORITIZES THE EDUCATIONAL NEEDS OF
STUDENTS USING EVIDENCE–BASED APPROACHES AND METHODOLOGIES; AND
(IV) (V) ACKNOWLEDGES TO STATE AND FEDERAL
STANDARDS ADDRESSES HOW STATE AND FEDERAL PRIVACY AND ACCESSIBILITY
STANDARDS APPLY TO THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INSTRUCTION IN
SCHOOLS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH OTHER INTERESTED
STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL PUBLISH SEPARATELY ON ITS WEBSITE GUIDANCE FOR
EACH OF THE FOLLOWING GROUPS:
(I) STUDENTS;
(II) EDUCATORS; AND
(III) ADMINISTRATORS; AND
(IV) PARENTS AND GUARDIANS.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 634
(3) EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE GUIDANCE
AND UPDATE THE GUIDANCE AS NECESSARY.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP STRATEGIES TO ASSIST COUNTY
BOARDS AND COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS TO IMPLEMENT THE GUIDELINES AND
BEST PRACTICES DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) ON OR BEFORE 120 DAYS FROM THE DATE THAT THE DEPARTMENT
RELEASES THE GUIDANCE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION,
EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL HAVE AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE POLICY
ALIGNED WITH THE GUIDANCE.
(D) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL DESIGNATE
A COORDINATOR BETWEEN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM AND THE STATE ON THE
PRODUCTIVE AND ETHICAL USE OF SYSTEMS OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(2) A COORDINATOR DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED AT THE CENTRAL OFFICE
ADMINISTRATION LEVEL AS NONINSTRUCTIONAL STAFF.
(E) EACH YEAR, MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY OR ANOTHER 4–YEAR
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE SHALL SUPPORT THE
DEPARTMENT:
(1) IN EVALUATING A PRIORITIZED LIST OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TOOLS SUBMITTED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT AND SCHOOLS;
AND
(2) TO CERTIFY THAT ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOOLS ARE
CONSISTENT WITH THE STATE GUIDELINES.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A RUBRIC AND
OTHER EVALUATIVE TOOLS, AS NECESSARY, TO ASSIST LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS IN
THE EVALUATION OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOOLS SELECTED FOR USE BY THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(2) THE RUBRIC SHALL BE DESIGNED TO SUPPORT LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS IN DETERMINING WHETHER ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOOLS ARE
CONSISTENT WITH STATE GUIDELINES.
(3) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL USE THE RUBRIC AND
OTHER EVALUATIVE TOOLS DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE REVIEW AND
– 3 –

Ch. 634 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SELECTION OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOOLS FOR USE WITHIN THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT PERIODICALLY MAY REVIEW AND UPDATE THE
RUBRIC AS NECESSARY TO REFLECT CHANGES IN TECHNOLOGY, LAW, OR STATE
POLICY.
(5) ON REQUEST, MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, OR ANOTHER 4–YEAR
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE, MAY SUPPORT LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS IN ASSESSING THE TOOLS AGAINST THE RUBRIC.
(F) LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS SHALL PROCURE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
TOOLS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF TITLE 3.5, SUBTITLE 8 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
7–2203.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD, SHALL ENSURE THAT
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE LITERACY IS A COMPONENT OF WORKFORCE
PREPARATION STANDARDS AND COMPUTER SCIENCE STANDARDS FOR
KINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 12.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE MARYLAND
CENTER FOR COMPUTING EDUCATION ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–118 OF THIS
ARTICLE AND COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING AND INSTRUCTIONAL
COACHES TO PROMOTE TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TRAINING IN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(2) THE TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TRAINING SHALL
BE IMPLEMENTED STATEWIDE IN A TRAIN–THE–TRAINER MODEL RELATED TO
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE LITERACY AND TECHNICAL EXPERTISE, WITH THE
INTENT OF TRAINING EDUCATORS BY JULY 1, 2027.
(3) (I) TEACHERS IN THE TEACHER PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT TRAINING SHALL BE COMPENSATED FOR THE TRAINING WITH TIME,
MONEY, OR RECERTIFICATION CREDITS.
(II) TEACHERS MAY NOT BE CHARGED TO ATTEND OR
COMPLETE THE TRAINING.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT IN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO EDUCATORS AND SCHOOL LEADERS THAT:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 634
(1) IS SUFFICIENT IN DURATION AND QUALITY TO PREPARE THE
EDUCATORS AND SCHOOL LEADERS:
(I) FOR THE PROFESSIONAL USE OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE;
(II) TO APPLY ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO INSTRUCTION;
AND
(III) TO UNDERSTAND ETHICAL CONSIDERATIONS OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE; AND
(2) PROVIDES SUBSTANTIVE COVERAGE OF:
(I) THE PURPOSE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN
EDUCATION;
(II) BASIC ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE VOCABULARY AND
CONCEPTS;
(III) HOW ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE WORKS;
(IV) EFFECTIVE CLASSROOM USE CASES, INCLUDING TO
STREAMLINE ADMINISTRATIVE TASKS, TO SUPPORT SPECIALLY DESIGNED
INSTRUCTION, AND TO PROVIDE TIMELY FEEDBACK; AND
(V) EFFECTIVE USE, PRIVACY, SECURITY, ACADEMIC
INTEGRITY, AND MEANS OF AVOIDING OVERDEPENDENCE; AND
(3) IS OFFERED:
(I) DURING THE EMPLOYEE’S REGULAR WORKDAY AS PART OF
TIME DESIGNATED FOR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT; OR
(II) AS A COURSE THAT IS ELIGIBLE FOR CREDIT TOWARD
LICENSURE RENEWAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
7–2204.
– 5 –

Ch. 634 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COLLABORATIVE” MEANS THE MARYLAND AI
EDUCATION COLLABORATIVE ON ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN K–12 EDUCATION.
(B) THERE IS A MARYLAND AI EDUCATION COLLABORATIVE ON
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN K–12 EDUCATION.
(C) THE COLLABORATIVE CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF
BOARDS OF EDUCATION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND STATE EDUCATION
ASSOCIATION, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF SCHOOL
PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATORS, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE PRESIDENT OF THE BALTIMORE TEACHERS UNION, OR THE
PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(5) (6) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL
SUPERINTENDENTS’ ASSOCIATION OF MARYLAND, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) (7) FIVE COORDINATORS DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY
BOARDS UNDER § 7–2202(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(7) (8) THREE REPRESENTATIVES FROM NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS THAT REPRESENT PARENTS;
(8) (9) THREE REPRESENTATIVES FROM STUDENT
ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(10) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION THAT
REPRESENTS STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES;
(11) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION THAT
REPRESENTS MULTILINGUAL FAMILIES AND STUDENTS;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 634
(9) (12) THREE REPRESENTATIVES FROM LABOR UNIONS THAT
REPRESENT TEACHERS, ADMINISTRATORS, AND SCHOOL SUPPORT STAFF;
(13) THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND CHAPTER OF THE
COMPUTER SCIENCE TEACHERS ASSOCIATION, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(14) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR
COMPUTING EDUCATION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(15) THE CHAIR OF THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
BOARD, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE; AND
(16) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY.
(D) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE TEACHERS
APPOINTED TO EDUCATORS CONSULTED BY THE COLLABORATIVE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(6) OF THIS SECTION SHALL REPRESENT DIVERSE SUBJECT AREAS
AND LICENSURE AREAS, INCLUDING GENERAL AND SPECIAL EDUCATORS.
(E) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE
COLLABORATIVE AND MAY ESTABLISH SUBCOMMITTEES OF THE COLLABORATIVE.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COLLABORATIVE; AND
(2) MAY PARTNER OR CONTRACT WITH AN ORGANIZATION TO
SUPPORT THE COLLABORATIVE.
(G) A MEMBER OF THE COLLABORATIVE:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COLLABORATIVE; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) THE COLLABORATIVE SHALL:
(1) STUDY THE USES OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN EACH LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM, INCLUDING A REVIEW OF INNOVATION BY INDUSTRY AND
PHILANTHROPIC SUPPORT OF SCHOOLS IN THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
AND
– 7 –

Ch. 634 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) MAKE FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING:
(I) THE DEVELOPMENT OR UPDATE OF THE GUIDANCE AND
BEST PRACTICES FOR COUNTY BOARDS UNDER § 7–2202 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF BEST PRACTICES FOR RELEVANT
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT; AND
(III) THE ADOPTION OF POLICIES AND PROCEDURES
REGARDING THE DEVELOPMENT, PROCUREMENT, IMPLEMENTATION, UTILIZATION,
AND ONGOING ASSESSMENT OF SYSTEMS THAT EMPLOY ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
BY A COUNTY BOARD.
(I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, BASED ON BEST PRACTICES FROM
ACROSS THE COUNTRY, THE COLLABORATIVE SHALL CREATE A DOCUMENT WITH
EXAMPLES OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INTEGRATED INTO CURRICULA,
INCLUDING EXAMPLES FOR:
(1) ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, AND HIGH SCHOOL CURRICULA; AND
(2) ALL SUBJECT AREAS REPRESENTED IN THE COURSES REQUIRED
FOR GRADUATION RECOMMEND A PROCESS FOR THE STATE BOARD TO UPDATE ON
A REGULAR BASIS RELEVANT STATE CONTENT STANDARDS TO ADDRESS THE ROLE
OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(J) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COLLABORATIVE SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE BOARD AND THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE LEVEL AND QUALITY OF:
(1) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT OFFERED BY LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS AND PARTICIPANTS IN EACH PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY
DISAGGREGATED BY ROLE;
(2) STATEWIDE ADOPTION OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE GUIDANCE;
(3) THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN INSTRUCTION;
(4) THE INSTRUCTION ON ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 634
(5) THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TOOLS;
(6) STUDENT SCREEN TIME PER GRADE IN EACH LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM; AND
(7) (5) THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN
ADMINISTRATIVE TASKS.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the
end of May 31, 2028, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 9 –